Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2978
Forms of contribution and valuation.

(1) Unless otherwise provided in the articles of organization or bylaws, the contributions of a member may consist of tangible or intangible property or other benefit to the limited cooperative association, including money, services performed or to be performed, promissory notes, other agreements to contribute cash or property, and contracts to be performed.

(2) The receipt and acceptance of contributions and the valuation of contributions shall be reflected in the limited cooperative association's required records pursuant to section 21-2910.

(3) Unless otherwise provided in the articles of organization or bylaws, the board of directors shall value the contributions received or to be received. The determination by the board of directors on valuation is conclusive for purposes of determining whether the member's contribution obligation has been fully met.

Laws 2007, LB368, § 78;

Laws 2008, LB848, § 19.